Utah statutes.
53A-6-603.    Administering of oaths -- Issuance of subpoenas.
(1)  UPPAC or a state or local school board charged with responsibility for
conducting an investigation or a hearing under this chapter may administer
oaths and issue subpoenas in connection with the investigation or hearing.
(2)  If a hearing is before a hearing officer or panel, the hearing officer or
panel may administer oaths, and the appointing body may issue subpoenas upon
the request of the hearing officer or panel.
(3)  Subpoenas shall be enforced upon the petition of the issuing body by the
district court in the jurisdiction where the subpoena was issued, in the same
manner as subpoenas issued by the court.
